North Carolina statutes. Chapter 71. Indians.
§§ 71-1 through 71-20.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 849, s. 1.

Cross References.

For present statute partially covering the subject matter of repealed

G.S. 71-1

to 71-12, see

G.S. 71A-1

to 71A-6.

For present provisions as to the North Carolina State Commission of Indian Affairs, see G.S. 143B-404 to 143B-411.

State Government Reorganization.

The Commission on Indian Affairs was transferred to the Department of Administration by a Type II transfer by Session Laws 1977, c. 849, s. 1, effective July 1, 1977.